North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-02.1 Health Statistics Act
23-02.1-28.
Copies of data from vital records.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

In accordance with section 23-02.1-27 and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto:

The state registrar shall, upon request of a person entitled to a copy under section 23-02.1-27, issue a certified copy of any record or part of a record in the registrar’s custody. Each copy issued must show the date of registration; and copies issued from records marked “delayed”, “amended”, or “court order” must be similarly marked and show the effective date of filing.

A certified copy of a record or any part of the record issued in accordance with subsection 1 must be considered evidence of the facts stated in the record, provided that the evidentiary value of a record filed more than one year after the event, or a record which has been amended, must be determined by the judicial or administrative body or official before whom the record is offered as evidence.

Data or copies may be furnished for statistical purposes to federal, state, local, or other public or private agencies, including the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics, upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the state department of health through rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

No person may prepare or issue any certificate or record which purports to be an original, certified copy, or copy of a certificate or record of birth, death, or fetal death, except as provided in this chapter, or regulations adopted under this chapter.

A certified copy may not disclose an individual’s social security number unless the copy is being provided to the individual to whom it pertains, a relative or authorized representative, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 28; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 382, § 5; 2007, ch. 234, § 20.

23-02.1-28.
Copies of data from vital records.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

In accordance with section 23-02.1-27 and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto:

The state registrar shall, upon request of a person entitled to a copy under section 23-02.1-27, issue a certified copy of any record or part of a record in the registrar’s custody. Each copy issued must show the date of registration; and copies issued from records marked “delayed”, “amended”, or “court order” must be similarly marked and show the effective date of filing.

A certified copy of a record or any part of the record issued in accordance with subsection 1 must be considered evidence of the facts stated in the record, provided that the evidentiary value of a record filed more than one year after the event, or a record which has been amended, must be determined by the judicial or administrative body or official before whom the record is offered as evidence.

Data or copies may be furnished for statistical purposes to federal, state, local, or other public or private agencies, including the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics, upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the department of health and human services through rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

No person may prepare or issue any certificate or record which purports to be an original, certified copy, or copy of a certificate or record of birth, death, or fetal death, except as provided in this chapter, or regulations adopted under this chapter.

A certified copy may not disclose an individual’s social security number unless the copy is being provided to the individual to whom it pertains, a relative or authorized representative, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 28; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 382, § 5; 2007, ch. 234, § 20; 2021, ch. 352, § 159, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-29.
Fees.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall prescribe the fees, if any, not to exceed fifteen dollars, to be paid for the following:

Each certified copy of a record.

Each certified statement of the facts of birth other than a copy of the original birth record.

Each filing of a new record of birth or fetal death following adoption.

Each filing of a delayed record of birth or death except as provided for in subsection 4 of section 23-02.1-18.

Each filing of an amendment to a birth or death record.

A search of the files or records when no copy is made.

A noncertified informational copy of a death or marriage record.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, fees collected under this section by the state registrar must be deposited in the operating fund of the state department of health, according to procedures established by the state treasurer.

The state department of health shall quarterly pay fees in the amount of two dollars for the issuance of each certified copy of a birth record, authorized by subsection 1, into the children’s trust fund created by section 50-27-01.

All fees collected in excess of the fees appropriated must be transferred to the general fund of this state at the end of each biennium.

The fee for each additional copy of a death or fetal death record, requested at the same time, may not exceed ten dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 29; 1981, ch. 280, § 1; 1983, ch. 288, § 1; 1985, ch. 539, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 22; 2019, ch. 4, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

23-02.1-29.
Fees.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall prescribe the fees, if any, not to exceed fifteen dollars, to be paid for the following:

Each certified copy of a record.

Each certified statement of the facts of birth other than a copy of the original birth record.

Each filing of a new record of birth or fetal death following adoption.

Each filing of a delayed record of birth or death except as provided for in subsection 4 of section 23-02.1-18.

Each filing of an amendment to a birth or death record.

A search of the files or records when no copy is made.

A noncertified informational copy of a death or marriage record.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, fees collected under this section by the state registrar must be deposited in the operating fund of the department of health and human services, according to procedures established by the state treasurer.

The department of health and human services shall quarterly pay fees in the amount of two dollars for the issuance of each certified copy of a birth record, authorized by subsection 1, into the children’s trust fund created by section 50-27-01.

All fees collected in excess of the fees appropriated must be transferred to the general fund of this state at the end of each biennium.

The fee for each additional copy of a death or fetal death record, requested at the same time, may not exceed ten dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 29; 1981, ch. 280, § 1; 1983, ch. 288, § 1; 1985, ch. 539, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 22; 2019, ch. 4, § 5, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 160, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-30.
Persons required to keep records.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Every person in charge of an institution as defined in this chapter shall keep a record of personal particulars and data concerning each person admitted or confined to such institution. This record must include all information required by the standard record of birth, death, and fetal death forms issued under the provisions of this chapter. The record must be made at the time of admission from information provided by such person, but when it cannot be obtained from that person, the information must be obtained from relatives or other persons acquainted with the facts. The name and address of the person providing the information must be a part of the record.

When a dead body or fetus is released or disposed of by an institution, the person in charge of the institution shall keep a record showing the name of the deceased, date of death, name and address of the person to whom the body is released, date of removal from the institution, or if finally disposed of by the institution, the date, place, and manner of disposition must be recorded.

A funeral director, embalmer, or other person who removed from the place of death or transports or finally disposes of a dead body or fetus, in addition to filing any record or other form required by this chapter, shall keep a record which must identify the body, and the information pertaining to receipt, removal, and delivery of the body as may be prescribed in regulations adopted by the state department of health.

Records maintained under this section must be made available to the state registrar or the registrar’s representative for inspection upon demand.

On or before the fifth day of each month, each hospital, institution, funeral director, embalmer, or person acting as such in this state shall report to the state registrar, on forms provided for this purpose, information required by the state registrar regarding each birth, death, or fetal death handled during the preceding calendar month.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 30; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 23; 2015, ch. 188, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

23-02.1-30.
Persons required to keep records.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Every person in charge of an institution as defined in this chapter shall keep a record of personal particulars and data concerning each person admitted or confined to such institution. This record must include all information required by the standard record of birth, death, and fetal death forms issued under the provisions of this chapter. The record must be made at the time of admission from information provided by such person, but when it cannot be obtained from that person, the information must be obtained from relatives or other persons acquainted with the facts. The name and address of the person providing the information must be a part of the record.

When a dead body or fetus is released or disposed of by an institution, the person in charge of the institution shall keep a record showing the name of the deceased, date of death, name and address of the person to whom the body is released, date of removal from the institution, or if finally disposed of by the institution, the date, place, and manner of disposition must be recorded.

A funeral director, embalmer, or other person who removed from the place of death or transports or finally disposes of a dead body or fetus, in addition to filing any record or other form required by this chapter, shall keep a record which must identify the body, and the information pertaining to receipt, removal, and delivery of the body as may be prescribed in regulations adopted by the department of health and human services.

Records maintained under this section must be made available to the state registrar or the registrar’s representative for inspection upon demand.

On or before the fifth day of each month, each hospital, institution, funeral director, embalmer, or person acting as such in this state shall report to the state registrar, on forms provided for this purpose, information required by the state registrar regarding each birth, death, or fetal death handled during the preceding calendar month.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 30; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 23; 2015, ch. 188, § 8, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 161, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-31.
Duties to furnish information relative to vital events.

Any person having knowledge of the facts shall furnish such information as the person may possess regarding any birth, death, fetal death, marriage, or divorce upon demand of the state registrar.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 31.

23-02.1-32.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully and knowingly makes any false statement in a report, record, or certificate required to be filed under this chapter, or in application for an amendment thereof, or who willfully and knowingly supplies false information intending that such information be used in the preparation of any such report, record, or certificate, or amendment thereof;

Any person who, without lawful authority and with the intent to deceive, makes, alters, or mutilates any report, record, or certificate required to be filed under this chapter or a certified copy of a report, record, or certificate;

Any person who willfully and knowingly uses or attempts to use or to furnish to another for use, for any purpose of deception, any certificate, record, report, or certified copy thereof so made, altered, amended, or mutilated;

Any person who, with the intention to deceive, willfully uses or attempts to use any certificate of birth or certified copy of a record of birth knowing that such certificate or certified copy was issued upon a record which is false in whole or in part or which relates to the birth of another person;

Any person who willfully and knowingly furnishes a certificate of birth or certified copy of a record of birth with the intention that it be used by a person other than the person to whom the record of birth relates; or

Any person who knowingly prepares, delivers, or uses a fraudulent or forged copy of a vital record;

Any person who refuses to provide information required by this chapter;

Any person who knowingly transports or accepts for transportation, interment, or other final disposition of a dead body or fetus without an accompanying final disposition-transit permit as provided in this chapter; or

Any person who willfully neglects or violates any of the provisions of this chapter or refuses to perform any of the duties imposed upon the person by this chapter;

is guilty of a class C felony.

is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 32; 2007, ch. 234, § 24; 2017, ch. 92, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

23-02.1-33.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Health Statistics Act”.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 33.